Hawaii statutes.
[§414-33] Incorporation. (a) The
corporate existence begins when the articles of incorporation are filed.

(b) The department director's filing of the
articles of incorporation is conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied
all conditions precedent to incorporation except in a proceeding by the State
to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the
corporation. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next